Utah statutes.
31A-2-201.1.   General filing requirements.
Except as otherwise provided in this title, the commissioner may set by rule
made in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, specific requirements for filing any of the following required by this
title:
(1)  a form;
(2)  a rate; or
(3)  a report.
